Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-105 Disclosure of information. The
identity of each original chartering applicant, and any information which is
not confidential shall be available to the public. The original [chartering]
applicants may request in writing that information be kept confidential. The
original chartering applicants shall designate and separate any matter which
the original chartering applicants claim is confidential and shall submit a
separate statement providing the reasons and authority for the request for confidential
treatment. The failure by the original chartering applicants to request
confidential treatment and designate and separate the confidential matter shall
preclude any objection or claim for wrongful disclosure of the same.
Information determined by the commissioner to be confidential, pursuant to the
original chartering applicants' request or otherwise, shall not be available to
the public. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next